Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.716

Pleading.

In a derivative action, the complaint must state with particularity:

(1) The date and content of plaintiff's demand and the general partners' response to the demand; or

(2) Why a demand should be excused as futile.

[ 2009 c 188 s 1004.]